Wyoming, session 2025, HB0310.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-206(n)(intro), 31-2-214(e),
31-3-101(g)(v), 31-3-103(m) and 31-18-201 by creating new
subsections (aa) through (dd) are amended to read:

HB0310

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0404
31-2-206. Annual renewal; delivery of license plates
and stickers; staggered registration; permanent
registration of trailers.

(n) Except for a trailer that is a house trailer or
mobile equipment, the owner of a trailer as defined in W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii), and subject to the provisions of
paragraphs (i) and paragraph (iii) of this subsection, may
permanently register the trailer upon payment of a fee in
the amount of three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) at the
time of initial registration. Alternatively, the owner may
permanently register the trailer by paying the fees under
subsection (o) of this section, provided the trailer:

31-2-214. Transfer of ownership.

(e) Upon transfer of ownership of a trailer that had
been permanently registered under W.S. 31-2-206(n) or
31-18-201(aa), the permanent registration of that trailer
expires and the original owner shall immediately remove the
license plate from that trailer. If within sixty (60) days
after the transfer of ownership the original owner acquires
another trailer for which the permanent license plate would
HB0310

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0404
be proper, the original owner may file an application for
the transfer of the license registration number to the
newly acquired trailer and the license plate may be
transferred by the original owner to the original owner's
newly acquired trailer. The original owner is not subject
to additional registration fees for the transfer of the
license registration number under this subsection upon
approval of the application and payment of the fees
required to permanently register a trailer under W.S.
31-2-206(n) or 31-18-201(aa).

31-3-101. Registration fees; exemptions.

(g) Owners of the following vehicles are exempt from
the payment of fees provided by subsections (a) and (b) of
this section:

(v) Trailers if permanently registered pursuant
to W.S. 31-2-206(n) through (q) or 31-18-201(aa) through
(dd).

31-3-103. Distribution of fees; refunds.

HB0310

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0404
(m) Fifty percent (50%) of the permanent registration
fee collected under W.S. 31-2-206(n) or 31-18-201(aa) shall
be distributed by county treasurers in the same proportion
and manner as property taxes are distributed. The remaining
fifty percent (50%) of the permanent registration fee
collected under W.S. 31-2-206(n) or 31-18-201(aa) shall be
distributed to the highway fund.

31-18-201. Commercial vehicles; registration;
exemptions; permanent registration of trailers.

(aa) Except for a trailer that is mobile equipment or
a power unit, the owner of a trailer as defined in W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xxiii) that qualifies as part of a commercial
vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(i) and is otherwise
subject to W.S. 31-18-401 may instead permanently register
the trailer upon payment of a fee in the amount of three
hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) at the time of initial
registration. Alternatively, the owner may permanently
register the trailer by paying the fees under subsection
(bb) of this section.

HB0310

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0404
(bb) Upon payment of the fees specified in subsection
(aa) of this section or this subsection, the department
shall issue a distinctive license plate indicating the
permanent registration of the trailer. After payment of the
fees under subsection (aa) of this section or this
subsection, the owner of a trailer that is permanently
registered under subsection (aa) of this section shall not
be subject to additional registration fees for as long as
the owner owns the trailer. If the one-time fee specified
in subsection (aa) of this section is not paid, the fees
for permanent registration of a trailer under subsection
(aa) of this section are:

(i) A permanent registration state
administration fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00);
and

(ii) An amount equal to five (5) times the
applicable fees under W.S. 31-3-101(a), plus any donation
amounts under W.S. 31-3-101(h) or (j). Any donated amount
shall not be subject to the requirement to pay five (5)
times the applicable amount.

HB0310

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0404
(cc) The owner of a trailer that is permanently
registered under subsection (aa) of this section shall
display the permanent registration license plate in
accordance with W.S. 31-2-205 only on the permanently
registered trailer for which the plate was issued, except
when transferred pursuant to W.S. 31-2-214(e).

(dd) The permanent registration of a trailer under
subsection (aa) of this section shall not be transferred to
a new owner. Upon transfer of a trailer that had been
permanently registered under subsection (aa) of this
section to a new owner, the new owner shall be subject to
all applicable title, registration and license fees under
title 31, chapter 2, articles 1 and 2, chapter 3 and
chapter 18, articles 2 and 4 of the Wyoming statutes as
applicable for the trailer. The new owner may permanently
register the trailer as provided in this section.

Section 2. W.S. 31-2-206(n)(i) is repealed.

Section 3. This act shall apply to trailers
registered on and after the effective date of this act.

HB0310

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0404
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0310